dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
inarpéxis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:inarpexar dp:in
banboŧar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xbaregone/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:xbaregonar dp:s
inxboase/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:inxboasar dp:s dp:in
xbratar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
buxar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2+0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
dïalogar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
inđalontre/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5Vp	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:inđalontrar dp:in
rinđóvene/T0t0T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:rinđovenar dp:in dp:re
fameliaríxis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:fameliarixar
fiakar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
fondaméntis/T0N0.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:fondamentar
frontar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2@0:0*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xgargatar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
xgraotar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
guàñis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:guañar
jobeƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2Vp	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
kanàjis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:kanajar
katarace/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:skataracar
kolmiđe/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:kolmiđar
skorpase/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:skorpasar dp:s
rekuerir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:re
làrdis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:lardar
ƚibarar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2-0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
loxar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
manifestar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xmegoƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:s
moltiplegar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2*0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
netrir/T0T1T2T3T4N1N2N4N5L1L2L3L4l1l2l3l4W0W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
oltriđe/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:oltriđar
palatiđe/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5-0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:palatiđar
pàtis/T0N0-1+0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:patar
peritar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2Vs	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
espiƚe/T0t1T2T3l0l2I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:espiƚar dp:ex
pone/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7@0-0-1+0^4^2.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:póner
prinsípis/T0N0+0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:prinsipar
regalixar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3W1P0P1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
ruƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
seđèle/T0t0T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:seđelar
simuƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2-0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
skujerar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
spase/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:spasar
stariƚíxis/T0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:stariƚixar
susúltis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:susultar dp:sub
protènde/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N7L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:protènder dp:pro
tonéjis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:tonejar
troboƚar/T0T1T2T3l1l2l3w1P0P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
inséndrole/T0t0T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:insendrolar dp:in
desipar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:de
vadiar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
xvilaníxis/T0N0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:xvilanixar dp:s
